apertium-ron-rup.rup.dix
    <pardef n="d/ormu__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ormu</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ornji</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oarme</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnjim</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnjitsi</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ormu</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>urnjam</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnjai</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnja</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnjam</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnjatsi</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnja</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>urnjii</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnjishi</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnji</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnjim</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnjit</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urnjirã</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>urnjitã</l><r>ormu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/at__vblex">
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atsi</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atim</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atitsi</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ãteam</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãteai</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãtea</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãteam</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãteatsi</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãtea</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãtui</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãtushi</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãtu</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãtum</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãtut</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãturã</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ãtutã</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c/ad__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ad</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adzi</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ade</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdem</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdetsi</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ad</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ãdeam</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdeai</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdea</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdeam</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdeatsi</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdea</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ãdzui</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdzushi</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdzu</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdzum</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdzut</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãdzurã</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ãdzutã</l><r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="lucr/edzu__vblex">
      <e><p><l>edzu</l><r>edzu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>edzi</l><r>edzu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadzã</l><r>edzu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãm</l><r>edzu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atsi</l><r>edzu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eadzã</l><r>edzu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cãnt/u__vblex">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sã</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ã</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãm</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atsi</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ã</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>am</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atsi</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ashi</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ã</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ãm</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arã</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>atã</l><r>u<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="cãntu"><i>cãnt</i><par n="cãnt/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lucredzu"><i>lucr</i><par n="lucr/edzu__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cad"><i>c</i><par n="c/ad__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bat"><i>b</i><par n="b/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dormu"><i>d</i><par n="d/ormu__vblex"/></e>
